suomimalaga/vvfst/poikkeavat-sukija.lexc
LEXICON SukijaOlla
[Tt][Ap][P1][Ny][Ef]on:on     Liitesana_a ;  # Mä oon.
[Tt][Ap][P2][Ny][Ef]ot:ot     Liitesana_a ;  # Sä oot.
[Tt][Ap][P3][Ny][Ef]mpi:mpi   Liitesana_a ;  # Hän ompi.
[Tt][Ap][P3][Ny][Ef]npi:npi   Liitesana_a ;  # Hän onpi.
[Tt][Ap][P2][Nm][Ef]otte:otte Liitesana_a ;  # Te ootte.
[Tt][Ap][P2][Nm][Ef]otta:otta Liitesana_a ;  # Te ootta.
[Te][Ap][P1][Ny][Ef]isin:isin Liitesana_a ;  # Mä oisin jne.
[Te][Ap][P2][Ny][Ef]isit:isit Liitesana_a ;
[Te][Ap][P3][Ny][Eb]isi:isi   Liitesana_a ;
[Te][Ap][P3][Ny][Eb]is:is     Liitesana_a ;
[Te][Ap][P1][Nm][Ef]isimme:isimme Liitesana_a ;
[Te][Ap][P2][Nm][Ef]isitte:isitte Liitesana_a ;
[Te][Ap][P3][Nm][Ef]isivat:isivat Liitesana_a ;
[Te][Ap][P3][Nm][Ef]isvat:isvat   Liitesana_a ;
o:o       Loppu ;   # Ei oo.
llos:llos Loppu ;   # Ollos huoleton.

LEXICON SukijaRangaista_a
gas:gas Nuolaista_w_a ;
kas:kas Nuolaista_s_a ;
kas:kas Johdin_U_arvelu_a ;

LEXICON SukijaRuoka
u:u NimisanaYhteisetMonikonPaikallissijat_a ;

LEXICON SukijaHerttua
NimisanaApila_m_a ;

LEXICON SukijaLohi
[Sg][Nm]t:t NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;

LEXICON SukijaOmistusliite_a_in
Omistusliite_a ;
[O1y]in:in Liitesana_a ;

LEXICON SukijaTuta
[Tn1p]takse:takse SukijaOmistusliite_a_in ;
[Tn2]ten:ten Liitesana_a ;

LEXICON SukijaKiiru
[Sg][Ny]hun:hun NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a ;
[Sp][Ny]a:a NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Sp][Ny]uta:uta NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Sn][Nm]t:t Liitesana_a ;
[Sill][Ny]use:use   NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sill][Ny]huse:huse NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sill][Nm]hisi:hisi NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_a ;
NimisanaYhteisetHTaivutusmuodot_a ;
[Ssti]sti:sti     LoppuLiitesana_a ;
[Ssti]husti:husti LoppuLiitesana_a ;

LEXICON SukijaNeiti
[Sg][Ny]tin:tin   Liitesana_a ;
?NotLaatusana     [Sn][Ny]te:te Omistusliite_ä	;
[Sp][Ny]ttä:ttä   NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ses][Ny]tenä:tenä NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ses][Ny]nnä:nnä   NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
de:de             NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_ä ;
ti:ti             NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_ä ;
[Sill][Ny]tee:tee   NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Sill][Ny]tehe:tehe NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Sn][Nm]det:det     Liitesana_ä	;
[Sill][Nm]tihi:tihi NimisanaLiOlN_ä ;
[Sko][Nm]tine:tine  NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
?Nimisana d:d       Johdin_ittAin_ä ;
?Nimisana de:de     Johdin_tOn_ä ;

LEXICON SukijaOri
[Str][Ny]iksi:iksi    NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ses][Ny]ina:ina      NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Sill][Ny]isee:isee   NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sab][Ny]itta:itta    NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ses][Ny]hina:hina    NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Str][Ny]hiksi:hiksi  NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Sill][Ny]hise:hise   NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sn][Nm]it:it         NimisanaMonikonNominatiivinJatko_a;
[Sn][Nm]hit:hit       NimisanaMonikonNominatiivinJatko_a;
[Sg][Nm]itt@D.YS_ALKANUT@:itt@D.YS_ALKANUT@ NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Sg][Nm]tt@D.YS_ALKANUT@:tt@D.YS_ALKANUT@ NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Sill][Nm]ihi:ihi     NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sill][Nm]isii:isii   NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sill][Nm]hisi:hisi   NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
NimisanaYhteisetHTaivutusmuodot_a ;

LEXICON SukijaUrosYksikkö
Omistusliite_a ;
[Sg][Ny]n:n    NimisanaYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a ;
[Ses][Ny]na:na NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
NimisanaYhteisetYksikönPaikallissijat_a ;
[Sn][Nm]t:t NimisanaMonikonNominatiivinJatko_a ;

LEXICON SukijaUrosMonikko
[Sg][Nm]itt:itt  NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ses][Ny]ina:ina NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
NimisanaYhteisetMonikonPaikallissijat_a ;
[Sko][Nm]ine:ine NimisanaOlVLoppu_a ;

LEXICON SukijaUros
o:o   SukijaUrosYksikkö ;
ho:ho SukijaUrosYksikkö ;
[Ses][Ny]sna:sna    NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Sill][Ny]osee:osee NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sill][Ny]hose:hose NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sg][Nm]hi:hi NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Sg][Nm]id:id NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Sp][Nm]ita:ita NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Sp][Nm]hia:hia NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
SukijaUrosMonikko ;
h:h SukijaUrosMonikko ;
[Sill][Nm]ihi:ihi   NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sill][Nm]isii:isii NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Sill][Nm]hisi:hisi NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ssti]osti:osti     Liitesana_a;

LEXICON SukijaLukusanaKolmattaYhdeksättä
[Bc]kolmatta:kolmatta       Liitesana_a     ;
[Bc]kolmatta:kolmatta       LukusananJälkiliite     ;
[Bc]neljättä:neljättä       Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]neljättä:neljättä       LukusananJälkiliite     ;
[Bc]viidettä:viidettä       Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]viidettä:viidettä       LukusananJälkiliite     ;
[Bc]kuudetta:kuudetta       Liitesana_a     ;
[Bc]kuudetta:kuudetta       LukusananJälkiliite     ;
[Bc]seitsemättä:seitsemättä Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]seitsemättä:seitsemättä LukusananJälkiliite     ;
[Bc]kahdeksatta:kahdeksatta Liitesana_a    ;
[Bc]kahdeksatta:kahdeksatta LukusananJälkiliite     ;
[Bc]yhdeksättä:yhdeksättä   Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]yhdeksättä:yhdeksättä   LukusananJälkiliite     ;

LEXICON SukijaJärjestyslukuKolmattaYhdeksättä
[Bc]kolmatta:kolmatta       Liitesana_a     ;
[Bc]kolmatta:kolmatta       LukusananJälkiliiteJl   ;
[Bc]neljättä:neljättä       Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]neljättä:neljättä       LukusananJälkiliiteJl   ;
[Bc]viidettä:viidettä       Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]viidettä:viidettä       LukusananJälkiliiteJl     ;
[Bc]kuudetta:kuudetta       Liitesana_a     ;
[Bc]kuudetta:kuudetta       LukusananJälkiliiteJl     ;
[Bc]seitsemättä:seitsemättä Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]seitsemättä:seitsemättä LukusananJälkiliiteJl     ;
[Bc]kahdeksatta:kahdeksatta Liitesana_a     ;
[Bc]kahdeksatta:kahdeksatta LukusananJälkiliiteJl     ;
[Bc]yhdeksättä:yhdeksättä   Liitesana_ä     ;
[Bc]yhdeksättä:yhdeksättä   LukusananJälkiliiteJl     ;

LEXICON SukijaAsemosanaMieMä
[Sall][Ny]ullen:ullen Liitesana_a ;

LEXICON SukijaAsemosanaMikä
[Sn][Ny]käs:käs   Loppu ;
[Sg][Ny]nkäs:nkäs Loppu ;
[Sg][Ny]nkäspähän:nkäspähän Loppu ;
[Sp][Ny]täshän:täshän     Loppu ;
[Sp][Ny]täspä:täspä       Loppu ;
[Sp][Ny]tästä:tästä       Loppu ;
[Sp][Ny]tästäpä:tästäpä   Loppu ;
[Str][Ny]ksikäs:ksikäs    Loppu ;
[Sela][Ny]stäkäs:stäkäs   Loppu ;
[Sill][Ny]hinkäs:hinkäs   Loppu ;
[Sill][Ny]nnekkä:nnekkä   Liitesana_ä ;
[Sill][Ny]nnekkäs:nnekkäs Loppu ;
[Sill][Ny]nnekkään:nnekkään Loppu ;
[Sill][Ny]nnekäs:nnekäs     Loppu ;
[Sall][Ny]llekäs:llekäs     Loppu ;
[Sn][Nm]tkäs:tkäs           Loppu ;

LEXICON SukijaAsemosanaMinä
[Sill][Ny]uhun:uhun   Liitesana_a ;
[Sall][Ny]ullen:ullen Liitesana_a ;

LEXICON SukijaAsemosanaNämä
[Sak][Ny]mät:mät Liitesana_ä ;


LEXICON SukijaSuhdesana
[Ld][Xp]ammolla[X]ammolla:ammolla Liitesana_a ;
[Ld][Xp]ammolla[X]ammollansa:ammollansa Liitesana_a ;


LEXICON SukijaSanasto
[Ln][Xp]aatelisneiti[X]aatelis[Bm]nei[Sg][Ny]den:aatelisneiden Loppu ;
[Ln][Xp]aatelisneiti[X]aatelis[Bm]nei[Sg][Ny]tten:aatelisneitten Loppu ;
[Ln][Xp]asu=analyysi[X]asu[Bm]analyys:asuanalyys NimisanaRisti_aä ;
[Ln][Xp]asu=koko[X]asu[Bm]ko@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@:asuko@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@ NimisanaKoko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]asu=kulttuuri[X]asu[Bm]kulttuur@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@:asukulttuur@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@ NimisanaPaperi_a ;
[Ln][Xp]asu=kuva[X]asu[Bm]kuv:asukuv NimisanaKoira_a ;
[Ln][Xp]asu=malli[X]asu[Bm]mall@P.INEN_KIELLETTY.ON@:asumall@P.INEN_KIELLETTY.ON@ NimisanaRisti_a ;
[Ln][Xp]asu=muoto[X]asu[Bm]muo@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@:asumuo@P.INEN_SALLITTU.ON@ NimisanaLeuto_a ;
[Ln][Xp]asu=paketti[X]asu[Bm]paket:asupaket NimisanaSalaatti_a ;
[Ln][Xp]asu=näyttelijä[X]asu[Bm]näyttelij:asunäyttelij NimisanaApila_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]asu=rooli=pelaaminen[X]asu[Bm]rooli[Bm]pelaami:asuroolipelaami NimisanaNainen_a ;
[Ln][Xp]asu=vaihdos[X]asu[Bm]vaihdo:asuvaihdo NimisanaVastaus_a ;
[Ln][Xp]asu=valikoima[X]asu[Bm]valikoim:asuvalikoim NimisanaAsema_a ;
[Ln][Xp]asu=valinta[X]asu[Bm]valin:asuvalin NimisanaKanta_a ;
[Ln][Xp]asu=varasto[X]asu[Bm]varasto:asuvarasto NimisanaArvelu_a ;
[Ln][Xp]herrasneiti[X][Xr]herras[Bm]nei[Sg][Ny]den:herrasneiden Loppu ;
[Ln][Xp]herrasneiti[X][Xr]herras[Bm]nei[Sg][Ny]tten:herrasneitten Loppu ;
[Ln][Xp]hovineiti[X]hovi[Bm]nei[Sg][Ny]den:hovineiden Loppu ;
[Ln][Xp]hovineiti[X]hovi[Bm]nei[Sg][Ny]tten:hovineitten Loppu ;
[Ln][Xp]ioota[X]iot:iot NimisanaKala_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kiiru[X]kiiruu:kiiruu Loppu ;
[Ln][Xp]neiti[X]nei[Sg][Ny]den:neiden   Loppu ;
[Ln][Xp]neiti[X]nei[Sg][Nm]tten:neitten Loppu ;
[Lt][Xp]olla[X]o:o SukijaOlla ;


LEXICON SukijaPoikkeavat_n
[Ln][Xp]aurinko[X]aurinko:aurinko NimisanaSukijaAurinko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]aatelisimpi[X]aatelis[Bm]im:aatelisim NimisanaSampi_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Sn][Nm]elävät[Bm]kuvat:elävätkuvat       Liitesana_a ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Sn][Nm]elävät[Bm]kuva:elävätkuva Omistusliite_a ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Sg][Nm]elävien[Bm]kuvi:elävienkuvi       NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Sp][Nm]eläviä[Bm]kuvia:eläviäkuvia       NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Ses][Nm]elävinä[Bm]kuvina:elävinäkuvina  NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Str][Nm]eläviksi[Bm]kuviksi:eläviksikuviksi      NimisanaLiOlI_a ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Sine][Nm]elävissä[Bm]kuvissa:elävissäkuvissa     NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Sela][Nm]elävistä[Bm]kuvista:elävistäkuvista     NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Sill][Nm]eläviin[Bm]kuvii:eläviinkuvii   NimisanaLiOlN_a ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Sade][Nm]elävillä[Bm]kuvilla:elävilläkuvilla     NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Sabl][Nm]eläviltä[Bm]kuvilta:eläviltäkuvilta     NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Sall][Nm]eläville[Bm]kuville:elävillekuville     NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Sab][Nm]elävittä[Bm]kuvitta:elävittäkuvitta      NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Sko][Nm]elävine[Bm]kuvine:elävinekuvine  NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]elävätkuvat[X][Sin][Nm]elävin[Bm]kuvin:elävinkuvin      Liitesana_a;
[Ln][Xp]etätulevaisuus[X]etä[Bm]tulevaisuu:etätulevaisuu NimisanaKalleus_a ;
[Ln][Xp]hame[X]hame[Sp][Ny]hta:hamehta NimisanaLiOlV_a ;
[Ln][Xp]ien[X]iken[Sn][Ny]e:ikene Loppu ;
[Ln][Xp]ien[X]ien[Ses][Ny]nä:iennä NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]kappale[X][Sg][Nm]kappalt:kappalt NimisanaMonikonGenetiiviEnJatko_a ;
[Ln][Xp]kiiru[X]kiiru:kiiru SukijaKiiru ;
[Ln][Xp]linnanimpi[X]linnan[Bm]im:linnanim NimisanaSampi_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]maailma[X]maailmoitse:maailmoitse Loppu ;
[Ln][Xp]maalaisimpi[X]maalais[Bm]im:maalaisim NimisanaSampi_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]moni[X]mon:mon NimisanaSukijaPieni_a ;
[Ln][Xp]muistiin=palautuminen[X]muistiin[Bm]palautumi:muistiinpalautumi NimisanaNainen_a ;
[Ln][Xp]neiti[X]nei:nei SukijaNeiti ;
[Ln][Xp]nuorimies[X]nuorna[Bm]miesnä:nuornamiesnä NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]ori[X]ori:ori   SukijaOri ;
[Ln][Xp]ruoka[X]ru:ru   SukijaRuoka ;
[Ln][Xp]sydän[X]sydämm:sydämm NimisanaUistin_m_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]uros[X]uro:uro  SukijaUros ;
[Ln][Xp]venäjä[X]venä[Sp][Ny]ttä:venättä NimisanaLiOlV_ä ;
[Ln][Xp]yhteen=sattuvaisuus[X]yhteen[Bm]sattuvaisuu:yhteensattuvaisuu NimisanaKalleus_a ;
[Ln][Xp]yhteen=sopivaisuus[X]yhteen[Bm]sopivaisuu:yhteensopivaisuu    NimisanaKalleus_a ;


LEXICON SukijaAsemosana
[Lr][Xp]jompi[X]jom:jom	AsemosanaKumpi ;
[Lr][Xp]mie[X]mi:mi     SukijaAsemosanaMieMä ;
[Lr][Xp]mikä[X]mi:mi	SukijaAsemosanaMikä ;
[Lr][Xp]minä[X]min:min  SukijaAsemosanaMinä ;
[Lr][Xp]mä[X]m:m        SukijaAsemosanaMieMä ;
[Lr][Xp]nämä[X]nä:nä    SukijaAsemosanaNämä ;
[Lr][Xp]sie[X]si:si     SukijaAsemosanaMieMä ;
[Lr][Xp]sinä[X]sin:sin  SukijaAsemosanaMinä ;
[Lr][Xp]sä[X]s:s        SukijaAsemosanaMieMä ;
[Lr][Xp]mones[X]mone:mone JärjestyslukuKahdeksasOmistusliitteet_a ;
